Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.250

No duty to request information.

RCW 9.38.015 does not create a duty for financial institutions to request the information set forth in RCW 9.38.015(1).

[ 1995 c 186 s 5. Formerly RCW 30.22.250.]